District of Columbia statutes.
38-1202.10

State consent.

The enactment of this unit shall, as respects the District of Columbia, be deemed to satisfy any requirement of state consent contained in any of the laws or provisions of law referred to in § 38-1202.09.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1429, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 209
renumbered § 210, Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2911

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1519.
1973 Ed., § 31-1720.